Utah statutes.
53A-23-102.   Revenues to be allocated to fund.
A local school board may annually allocate to the fund any revenues from the
state which are made available for capital outlay purposes, and not otherwise
earmarked, and such other revenues as the school district may raise locally
for this purpose.
